Mississippi, session 2026, HB4117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Kynoa Trotter of Pike County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Burglary Nonresidential on October 31, 2017, in Pearl River County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced to serve seven (7) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  On March 4, 2019, he was convicted for the crime of Possession of a Firearm by a convicted felon in Walthall County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced to two (2) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections and five (5) years probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was discharged on May 19, 2020, due to expiration of sentence.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.